Arkansas statutes. Title 28 Wills, Estates, and Fiduciary Relationships
Chapter 39 Rights Of Surviving Family Members
28-39-401. Rights of surviving spouse — Limitations.

When a married person dies testate as to all or any part of his or her estate, the surviving spouse shall have the right to take against the will if the surviving spouse has been married to the decedent continuously for a period in excess of one (1) year.

In the event of such an election, the rights of the surviving spouse in the estate of the deceased spouse shall be limited to the following:

The surviving spouse, if a woman, shall receive dower in the deceased husband's real estate and personal property as if he had died intestate. The dower shall be additional to her homestead rights and statutory allowances; and

The surviving spouse, if a man, shall receive a curtesy interest in the real and personal property of the deceased spouse to the same extent as if she had died intestate. The curtesy interest shall be additional to his homestead rights and statutory allowances; and

If, after the assignment of dower or curtesy, as the case may be, and the payment of all statutory allowances, taxes, and debts, and the satisfaction of all testamentary gifts and devises, there shall remain some residue of the deceased spouse's estate which is not disposed of by will, then, if the deceased spouse shall have been survived by no natural or adopted child, or the descendants of any natural or adopted child, and by no parent, brother, sister, grandparent, uncle, aunt, great-grandparent, great-uncle, great-aunt, or the lineal descendants of any of them, then the surviving spouse will take by inheritance the undisposed residue.

Ark. L. Rev.

Note, Estate of Shelfer v. Commissioner of Internal Revenue: Is the Tax Court's Position on QTIPs “Stub”born or Justified?, 48 Ark. L. Rev. 987.

Comment, Arkansas Marriage: A Partnership Between a Husband and Wife, or a Safety Net for Support?, 61 Ark. L. Rev. 735.

Maria Korzendorfer, Case Note: In re Estate of Thompson: The Shortcomings of the Arkansas Elective Share Statute, 68 Ark. L. Rev. 1089 (2016).

U. Ark. Little Rock L.J.

Note, Constitutional Law — Equal Protection — Arkansas' Gender-Based Statutes on Dower, Election, Statutory Allowances, and Homestead Are Unconstitutional, Hess v. Wims, 272 Ark. 43, 613 S.W.2d 85 (1981); Stokes v. Stokes, 271 Ark. 300, 613 S.W.2d 372, 18 A.L.R.4th 903 (1981), 4 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 361.

Seventeenth Annual Survey of Arkansas Law — Property, 17 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 453.

U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev.

Lucy L. Holifield, Note: Property Law—Upending the Familiar Tools of Estate Planning: Equity Renders Revocable Trusts Subject to the Arkansas Spousal Election. In re Estate of Thompson, 38 U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev. 75 (2015).

Lynn Foster, Arkansas’s Trust Code and Trust Planning: A Ten-Year Perspective, 38 U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev. 301 (2016).

This section, which allowed a widow, at her election, to take dower against the will of her husband under any condition, but allowed a husband to take curtesy against the will of his wife only if her will was executed before the marriage, was unconstitutional as a violation of the equal protection clause of the Fourteenth Amendment to the United States Constitution, since no valid compensatory purpose or justifiable governmental function could be found to sustain its gender-based discrimination. Hess v. Wims, 272 Ark. 43, 613 S.W.2d 85 (1981) (decision prior to 1981 amendment).

This section was an unconstitutional violation of the equal protection clause of the Fourteenth Amendment to the U. S. Constitution since it was gender-based and served no important governmental function. Stokes v. Stokes, 271 Ark. 300, 613 S.W.2d 372 (1981), overruled in part, Beck v. Merritt, 280 Ark. 331, 657 S.W.2d 549 (1983) (decision prior to 1981 amendment).

A devisee and beneficiary of a decedent's will who was not an heir and who stood to lose financially if the decedent's wife claimed against the will pursuant to this section and received statutory allowances provided for in §28-39-101 had standing to challenge the constitutionality of both statutes since the test is whether the party would lose financially unless the issue was raised. Huffman v. Dawkins, 273 Ark. 520, 622 S.W.2d 159 (1981) (decision prior to 1981 amendment).

This section, which classes differently those people who have been married less than one year from those who have been married more than one year, does not violate the equal protection clause of the 14th Amendment to the United States Constitution; this classification is not invidious because it bears a rational relationship to the permissible state objectives of preventing deathbed marriages and protecting the assets of a decedent in cases in which the assertion of a dower interest would often be contrary to the decedent's intent. In re Estate of Epperson, 284 Ark. 35, 679 S.W.2d 792 (1984), cert. denied, Epperson v. Estate of Epperson, 471 U.S. 1017, 105 S. Ct. 2022 (1985).

This section is designed to prevent injustices when a marriage endures until the death of the husband or the wife. Hamilton v. Hamilton, 317 Ark. 572, 879 S.W.2d 416 (1994).

Act 714 of 1981, which created gender-neutral awards of dower and curtesy under this section and allowances under §28-39-101, is substantive rather than procedural and therefore should not be applied retroactively. Huffman v. Dawkins, 273 Ark. 520, 622 S.W.2d 159 (1981); Hall v. Hall, 274 Ark. 266, 623 S.W.2d 833 (1981), cert. denied, 456 U.S. 916, 102 S. Ct. 1770 (1982).

Since this section as it existed prior to its amendment by Act 714 of 1981, under which a widow claimed her first election against the testator's will, was declared unconstitutional and since Act 714, which was not gender-based and allowed a widow to take the same as she could have taken under the old statute, could not be applied retroactively, a widow was not entitled to dower rights from the testator's estate where her claim arose prior to the enactment of Act 714. Stokes v. Stokes, 275 Ark. 110, 628 S.W.2d 6 (1982).

Act 714 of 1981, which cured the constitutional infirmity of this curtesy statute by substituting a neutral-based treatment in place of the gender-based treatment, created substantive rights, not merely procedural rights, and is not subject to a retroactive application in favor of a surviving husband who sought a curtesy interest in the estate of his deceased wife. Gent v. Goin, 275 Ark. 479, 631 S.W.2d 303 (1982).

Where a husband's will made an absolute gift of both real and personal property to his wife, a subsequent item stating that the provision was in lieu of dower did not limit the wife's share to what she would have received as dower, it having only the effect of requiring the widow to make her election. Gathright v. Gathright, 175 Ark. 1130, 1 S.W.2d 809 (1928) (decision under prior law).

Where a will devised a homestead and certain personal property to a wife, expressly stating that it was not in lieu of dower, but in addition thereto, and directed that the residue of the testator's property should be divided, one-half to the wife and one-half to the testator's collateral heirs, it was held that the specific devise was not in lieu of dower and that she took one-half of the residue freed from his debts. Chambless v. Gentry, 178 Ark. 558, 11 S.W.2d 460 (1928) (decision under prior law).

Dower is to be carved from property possessed by decedent at death and not from property thereafter changed from realty to personalty. Atkinson v. Van Echaute, 236 Ark. 423, 366 S.W.2d 273 (1963).

Where a widow elects to take a dower interest against the will and consents to the conversion of the realty owned by testator at death into cash, as provided by the will, she may not, as the result of the conversion, thereby maintain a claim to one-third of the gross estate but, with respect to realty, is limited to a life interest in the proceeds from the sale of the realty. Atkinson v. Van Echaute, 236 Ark. 423, 366 S.W.2d 273 (1963).

Where a will leaves the surviving spouse nothing, he or she is put to an election. Estate of Dahlmann v. Estate of Dahlmann, 282 Ark. 296, 668 S.W.2d 520 (1984).

Where the decedent had previously executed a reciprocal will and a separate contract not to revoke the wills with his first wife, and where the two wills of the couple created testamentary trusts giving the six children of their marriage the estate of the surviving spouse, the rights of the children as trust beneficiaries under the contract and reciprocal wills were paramount, and they prevailed over a second wife electing to take against the will. Gregory v. Estate of Gregory, 315 Ark. 187, 866 S.W.2d 379 (1993).

The decedent's surviving spouse was not entitled to take against the decedent's will where their marriage lasted only 13 days before he died, notwithstanding that they had been previously married three separate times for a total of more than 15 years. Shaw v. Shaw, 337 Ark. 530, 989 S.W.2d 919 (1999).

Surviving spouse alleging a decedent defrauded the spouse of the spouse's right to an elective share of the decedent's estate did not have to show common-law fraud because “fraud on marital rights” was not akin to common-law fraud.Thompson v. Thompson, 2014 Ark. 237, 434 S.W.3d 877 (2014).

When a decedent's inter vivos trust defeated a surviving spouse's share of the decedent's estate, it was no error to let the spouse take from trust assets because (1) the assets were included in the decedent's estate only to calculate the spouse's elective share, and (2) the trust was otherwise left intact.Thompson v. Thompson, 2014 Ark. 237, 434 S.W.3d 877 (2014).

It was no error to find a decedent intended to defraud a surviving spouse of the spouse's share of the decedent's estate because (1) evidence supported multiple findings that the decedent's $100,000 bequest intended to deprive the spouse of the spouse's share of the decedent's $6 million estate, and (2) the decedent's inter vivos gifts to the spouse were not considered as the gifts were not testamentary when made.Thompson v. Thompson, 2014 Ark. 237, 434 S.W.3d 877 (2014).

Provisions of a will designating the particular beneficiaries for certain insurance policies which had been issued payable to testator's estate had same effect of changing the beneficiaries named in the policies as though testator had written to the insurance companies and followed their required procedure for changing beneficiaries; thus the policies did not pass to the executors as assets of the estate and were not subject to the dower interest of the testator's wife. Clements v. Neblett, 237 Ark. 340, 372 S.W.2d 816 (1963).

A widow who elected to take against a will could not enforce provision leaving real property and insurance policies to nieces and nephew with instructions that all debts and taxes be paid; therefore, the widow was charged with one-half of the indebtedness in the real property. Clements v. Neblett, 237 Ark. 340, 372 S.W.2d 816 (1963).

Where a will executed prior to marriage did not provide for the widow, the widow's right to take against the will was personal to her and did not survive where she died before making election to so take against will. Lamb v. Ford, 239 Ark. 339, 389 S.W.2d 419 (1965).

The public policy set forth in this section is disallowed only in limited circumstances such as in the case when the electing spouse was married to the decedent for less than a year. Gregory v. Estate of Gregory, 315 Ark. 187, 866 S.W.2d 379 (1993).

A spouse has the right to make a will which excludes a surviving spouse or provides for a bequest or devise in lieu of dower; that a surviving spouse may take against a will prevents any injustice that might result from the spouse's exercise of that right. Estate of Dahlmann v. Estate of Dahlmann, 282 Ark. 296, 668 S.W.2d 520 (1984).

A will was not revoked by testator's marriage subsequent to its execution (but see now §28-25-109) where no issue was born of the marriage, but the will did not exclude the widow from the interest she would have taken had her husband died intestate and devisees would take subject to the will as modified by the marriage. Fleming v. Blount, 202 Ark. 507, 151 S.W.2d 88 (1941) (decision under prior law).

Where a spouse dies testate, the surviving spouse must exercise the option to take against the will in his or her lifetime; otherwise, the right is forfeited because it is personal and does not survive the surviving spouse. Estate of Dahlmann v. Estate of Dahlmann, 282 Ark. 296, 668 S.W.2d 520 (1984).

The surviving spouse's elective interest in the decedent's estate vests immediately upon the spouse's death, but it can vest only in property which the deceased spouse owned at the time of death. Gregory v. Estate of Gregory, 315 Ark. 187, 866 S.W.2d 379 (1993).

Under §28-25-109, any bequest to a former spouse is void, but the remainder of the will remains in effect; unless the will is completely revoked because all of its substantive provisions favor a decedent's former spouse, the decedent will have died testate, and this section will apply. Section28-25-109 does not require a holding that this section is not intended to be applied when the will predates a marriage. In re Estate of Epperson, 284 Ark. 35, 679 S.W.2d 792 (1984), cert. denied, Epperson v. Estate of Epperson, 471 U.S. 1017, 105 S. Ct. 2022 (1985).

This section does not make a distinction concerning wills that predate a marriage and those made after a marriage. Davis v. Aringe, 292 Ark. 549, 731 S.W.2d 210 (1987).

Cited: Anderson v. Parker, 230 Ark. 335, 323 S.W.2d 414 (1959); Faver v. Faver, 266 Ark. 262, 583 S.W.2d 44 (1979); Owen v. Owen, 267 Ark. 532, 592 S.W.2d 120 (1980); Bennett v. Estate of Bennett, 275 Ark. 262, 628 S.W.2d 565 (1982); McGuire v. McGuire, 275 Ark. 432, 631 S.W.2d 12 (1982); In re Estate of Epperson, 284 Ark. 35, 679 S.W.2d 792 (1984).

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 33; 1970 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 14, § 1; 1981, No. 714, § 17; A.S.A. 1947, § 60-501.

28-39-402. Notice to spouse of right to elect.

Within one (1) month after the will of a married person has been admitted to probate, the clerk shall mail a notice to the decedent's surviving spouse at his or her mailing address, if known, in which shall be stated the time within which a written election must be filed by or on behalf of the surviving spouse in order to take against the will.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 34; A.S.A. 1947, § 60-502.

28-39-403. Spouse's time limitation for filing election.

The election by a surviving spouse to take against the will may be made at any time within one (1) month after the expiration of the time limited for the filing of claims.

However, if, at the expiration of the period for making the election, litigation is pending to test the validity or to determine the effect or construction of the will or to determine the existence of issue surviving the deceased or to determine any other matter of law or fact which would affect the amount of the share to be received by the surviving spouse, the right of the surviving spouse to make an election shall not be barred until the expiration of one (1) month after the date of the final order of the circuit court adjudicating the issue in litigation.

Ark. L. Rev.

Haught, 1988 Update to the Arkansas Probate System: An Overview of Recent Developments in Arkansas Probate Practice, 42 Ark. L. Rev. 631.

The notice by a probate clerk to a surviving spouse to elect to take against a will is not jurisdictional, and therefore a failure to notify will not give her heirs her personal right to take against the will. Jeffcoat v. Harper, 224 Ark. 778, 276 S.W.2d 429 (1955).

A spouse's right to elect against a will is personal and for her benefit; therefore, her heirs cannot exercise it after her death even though the spouse was insane from before testator's death until her death and although no guardian was appointed as the will suggested who could have exercised her rights. Jeffcoat v. Harper, 224 Ark. 778, 276 S.W.2d 429 (1955).

Cited: Farmers Coop. Ass'n v. Webb, 249 Ark. 277, 459 S.W.2d 815 (1970).

A spouse's right to elect against a will is personal and for her benefit; and therefore her heirs cannot exercise it after her death even though the spouse was insane from before testator's death until her death and although no guardian was appointed as the will suggested who could have exercised her rights. Jeffcoat v. Harper, 224 Ark. 778, 276 S.W.2d 429 (1955).

The provision that the right of election of the surviving spouse is personal, is not transferable, and does not survive the surviving spouse does not make the interest secured by the exercise of such an election a terminable or contingent estate. Bradham v. United States, 287 F. Supp. 10 (W.D. Ark. 1968).

Where a spouse dies testate, the surviving spouse must exercise the option to take against the will in his or her lifetime; otherwise, the right is forfeited because it is personal and does not survive the surviving spouse. Estate of Dahlmann v. Estate of Dahlmann, 282 Ark. 296, 668 S.W.2d 520 (1984).

An election to take against a will was not made in a timely manner where (1) the appellees filed the election, on behalf of the surviving spouse, to take against the will prior to the death of the surviving spouse, but (2) the appellees never sought or received the probate court's authorization prior to the time that they purported to make the election, and (3) the appellees did not seek such authorization until after the death of the surviving spouse. Burch v. Griffe, 342 Ark. 559, 29 S.W.3d 722 (2000).

Where a will executed prior to marriage did not provide for a widow, the widow's right to take against the will was personal to her and did not survive where she died before making an election to take against will. Lamb v. Ford, 239 Ark. 339, 389 S.W.2d 419 (1965).

Where a husband's will left nothing to his wife and she died without electing to take against the will, her right to claim dower did not survive her and could not be exercised by her estate. Estate of Dahlmann v. Estate of Dahlmann, 282 Ark. 296, 668 S.W.2d 520 (1984).

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 35; A.S.A. 1947, § 60-503.

28-39-404. Form of election — Filing.

(1)The election to take against the will shall be:

In writing, signed and acknowledged by the surviving spouse or by the guardian of his or her estate; and

Filed in the office of the probate clerk of the circuit court.

It shall be in substantially the following form:

“I, A. B., surviving wife (or husband) of C. D., deceased, hereby renounce and disclaim any and all benefits under the will of C. D., and elect to take from the estate of C. D. only the property and benefits which (because of this election) will accrue to me under Section 33 of Act No. 140, approved February 23, 1949, as amended. DATED:
, 20 . SIGNED:
” (ACKNOWLEDGMENT)

Click to view form.

The clerk shall record the election in the will records. The personal representative shall, and any interested person may, file for record with the circuit clerk and recorder of each other county in this state in which the decedent, at the time of his or her death, owned an estate of inheritance in real property a duplicate original or certified copy of the election.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 36; 1970 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 14, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 60-504; Acts 2003, No. 1185, § 276.

28-39-405. Right of election personal to surviving spouse.

The right of election of the surviving spouse is personal. It is not transferable and does not survive the surviving spouse.

The guardian of the estate of an incompetent surviving spouse, when authorized by the court having jurisdiction over the estate of the ward, may elect to take against the will in the ward's behalf.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 37; A.S.A. 1947, § 60-505.

28-39-406. Revocation of spouse's election.

An election made by or on behalf of a surviving spouse to take against the will shall be binding and shall not be subject to revocation, except within the time provided by §28-39-403 for filing an election and prior to any distribution made on the basis of the election, or thereafter for such causes as would justify a decree for the rescission of a deed.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 38; A.S.A. 1947, § 60-506.